es: Sistema de tensado: Tensado por cable; Enganche de plegado rápido; Ninguno; Tensado por varilla; Mecanismo de tijera; Tensado por resorte; Tensado por pestañas; Otros
en: Tensioning system: Cable tensioned; Fast-fold snap; None; Rod tensioned; Scissor mechanism; Spring tensioned; Tab-tensioned; Other
tr: Germe sistemi: Kablo gerginlikli; Hızlı katlamalı çıtçıt; Hiçbiri; Çubuk gerginlikli; Makas mekanizması; Yay gerginlikli; Sekmeli gerginlik; Diğer
ja: テンショニングシステム: ケーブルテンション; ファストフォールドスナップ; なし; ロッドテンション; シザーメカニズム; スプリングテンション; タブテンション; その他
nb: Strammesystem: Kabelstrammet; Hurtigfoldbar feste; Ingen; Stangstrammet; Saksemekanisme; Fjærstrammet; Tappstrammet; Annet
lt-LT: Įtempimo sistema: Kabelio įtempimas; Greito sulankimo fiksavimas; Nėra; Strypo įtempimas; Žirklių mechanizmas; Spyruoklinis įtempimas; Kabliukų įtempimas; Kita
fr: Système de tension: Tendu par câble; Pliage rapide à pression; Aucune; Tendu par tige; Mécanisme à ciseaux; Tendu par ressort; Tendu par languettes; Autre
it: Sistema di tensionamento: Tensionamento a cavo; Fast-fold a scatto; Nessuna; Tensionamento ad asta; Meccanismo a forbice; Tensionamento a molla; Tensionamento a linguette; Altro
sl-SI: Sistem napenjanja: Napeto s kablom; Hitro zložljivo s pritrdilom; Brez; Napeto s palico; Škarjasti mehanizem; Napeto z vzmetmi; Napeto z jezički; Drugo
nl: Spansysteem: Kabelgespannen; Snelklapbevestiging; Geen; Staafgespannen; Schaarmechanisme; Veergespannen; Lipjesgespannen; Andere
ro-RO: Sistem de tensionare: Tensionat cu cablu; Prindere rapidă pliabilă; Niciuna; Tensionat cu tijă; Mecanism tip foarfece; Tensionat cu arc; Tensionat cu cleme; Altele
el: Σύστημα τάνυσης: Τεντωμένο με καλώδιο; Γρήγορης σύμπτυξης με κούμπωμα; Καμία; Τεντωμένο με ράβδο; Μηχανισμός ψαλιδιού; Τεντωμένο με ελατήριο; Τεντωμένο με γλωττίδες; Άλλο
cs: Napínací systém: Napínání kabelem; Rychlé skládací uchycení; Žádný; Napínání tyčí; Nůžkový mechanismus; Napínání pružinou; Napínání výčnělky; Jiné
pl: System napinania: Napinany kablem; Szybkie składanie zatrzaskowe; Brak; Napinany prętem; Mechanizm nożycowy; Napinany sprężyną; Napinany zakładkami; Inne
da: Opstramningssystem: Kabelspændt; Hurtigfold snap; Ingen; Stangspændt; Saksemekanisme; Fjederspændt; Fligspændt; Andet
hr-HR: Sustav zatezanja: Napinjanje kabelom; Brzo sklapanje; Nema; Napinjanje šipkom; Mehanizam škara; Napinjanje oprugom; Napinjanje jezičcima; Ostalo
zh-CN: 张紧系统: 拉线张紧式; 快速折叠卡扣式; 无; 拉杆张紧式; 剪刀机构; 弹簧张紧式; 拉绳张紧式; 其他
zh-TW: 張緊系統: 纜線張緊; 快速折疊扣合; 無; 桿式張緊; 剪刀機構; 彈簧張緊; 拉片張緊; 其他
bg-BG: Система за опън: С кабелно опъване; Бързо сгъваем с щракване; Няма; С опъване чрез пръчка; Ножичен механизъм; С пружинно опъване; С опъване чрез етикети; Други
pt-BR: Sistema de tensionamento: Tensionado por cabo; Encaixe rápido dobrável; Nenhum; Tensionado por haste; Mecanismo de tesoura; Tensionado por mola; Tensionado por abas; Outro
sk-SK: Napínací systém: Napínané káblom; Rýchloskladacie západkové; Žiadny; Napínané tyčou; Nožnicový mechanizmus; Napínané pružinou; Napínané výčnelkami; Iné
vi: Hệ thống căng: Căng bằng cáp; Gấp nhanh; Không có; Căng bằng thanh; Cơ cấu kéo; Căng bằng lò xo; Căng bằng mấu; Khác
fi: Kiristysjärjestelmä: Vaijerikiristys; Pikakokoontaittuva napsautus; Ei mitään; Tankokiristeinen; Saksimekanismi; Jousikiristeinen; Kielekekiristeinen; Muu
ru: Система натяжения: Кабельное натяжение; Быстрая складная защёлка; Нет; Стержневое натяжение; Ножничный механизм; Пружинное натяжение; Натяжение с зацепами; Другой
th: ระบบการตึงผ้า: ระบบดึงด้วยสายเคเบิล; ระบบพับเร็วแบบเสียบล็อก; ไม่มี; ระบบดึงด้วยแกน; กลไกกรรไกร; ระบบดึงด้วยสปริง; ระบบดึงด้วยแท็บ; อื่นๆ
ko: 텐션 시스템: 케이블 텐션; 패스트 폴드 스냅; 없음; 로드 텐션; 시저 메커니즘; 스프링 텐션; 탭 텐션; 기타
de: Spannsystem: Kabelgespannt; Fast-Fold-Snap; Keine; Stangengespannt; Scherenmechanismus; Federgespannt; Tab-gespannt; Sonstiges
hu: Feszítőrendszer: Kábellel feszített; Gyorshajtású pattintós; Egyik sem; Rúddal feszített; Ollós mechanizmus; Rugóval feszített; Fülekkel feszített; Egyéb
pt-PT: Sistema de tensionamento: Tensionado por cabo; Encaixe rápido dobrável; Nenhum; Tensionado por haste; Mecanismo de tesoura; Tensionado por mola; Tensionado por abas; Outro
sv: Spänningssystem: Kabelspänd; Snabbvikbar snap; Inga; Stångspänd; Saxmekanism; Fjäderspänd; Flikspänd; Övrigt